Florida, session 2026, HB6509.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The sum of $1.2 million is appropriated from
the State Transportation Trust Fund to the Department of
Transportation for the relief of the Estate of Mark LaGatta for
injuries and damages sustained by Mr. LaGatta.
Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
a warrant in favor of the Estate of Mark LaGatta in the amount
of $1.2 million upon funds of the Department of Transportation
in the State Treasury and to pay the same out of such funds in
the State Treasury.
Section 4. The amount paid by the Department of
Transportation pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6509 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 6509 2026 Legislature
amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
compensation for all present and future claims arising out of
the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
injuries and damages to Mark LaGatta. The total amount paid for
attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent
of the total amount awarded under this act.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6509 -02-er